Nevada, session 83, AB236.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.021 1. The State Board of Education is hereby created.
The State Board consists of the following voting members:
(a) One member elected by the registered voters of each
congressional district described in the shapefile adopted by
NRS 304.095;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) One member appointed by the Governor, nominated by the
Majority Leader of the Senate; and
(d) One member appointed by the Governor, nominated by the
Speaker of the Assembly.
2. In addition to the voting members described in subsection 1,
the State Board consists of the following four nonvoting members:
(a) One member appointed by the Governor who is a member of
a board of trustees of a school district, nominated by the Nevada
Association of School Boards;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor who is the
superintendent of schools of a school district, nominated by the
Nevada Association of School Superintendents;
(c) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Nevada System of Higher Education, nominated by the Board of
Regents of the University of Nevada; and
(d) One member appointed by the Governor who is a pupil
enrolled in a public school in this State, nominated by the Nevada
Association of Student Councils or its successor organization and in
consultation with the Nevada Youth Legislature. After the initial
term, the term of the member appointed pursuant to this paragraph
commences on June 1 and expires on May 31 of the following year.
3. Each member of the State Board elected pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 must be a qualified elector of the
district from which that member is elected.
4. Each member appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and
(d) of subsection 1 and each member appointed pursuant to
subsection 2 must be a resident of this State.
5. Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (c) of
subsection 2, a person who is elected to serve as an officer of this
State or any political subdivision thereof or a person appointed to
serve for the unexpired term of such an office may not serve or
continue to serve on the State Board.
6. The Governor shall ensure that the members appointed
pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subsection 1 represent the
geographic diversity of this State and that:
(a) One member is a teacher at a public school selected from a
list of six candidates consisting of three candidates provided by the
[Nevada State Education Association.] employee organization
representing the plurality of teachers employed by a large school
district and three candidates provided by the employee
organization representing the plurality of teachers employed by
school districts in this State other than a large school district.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) One member is the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
enrolled in a public school.
(c) One member is a person active in a private business or
industry of this State.
7. After the initial terms, each member:
(a) Elected pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 serves a
term of 4 years. A member may be elected to serve not more than
three terms but may be appointed to serve pursuant to paragraph (b),
(c) or (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 after service as an elected
member, notwithstanding the number of terms the member served as
an elected member.
(b) Appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of
subsection 1 serves a term of 2 years, except that each member
continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A member may be
reappointed for additional terms of 2 years in the same manner as
the original appointment.
(c) Appointed pursuant to subsection 2 serves a term of 1 year.
A member may be reappointed for additional terms of 1 year in the
same manner as the original appointment.
8. If a vacancy occurs during the term of:
(a) A member who was elected pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the Governor shall appoint a member to fill the
vacancy until the next general election, at which election a member
must be chosen for the balance of the unexpired term. The appointee
must be a qualified elector of the district where the vacancy occurs.
(b) A voting member appointed pursuant to paragraph (b), (c) or
(d) of subsection 1 or a nonvoting member appointed pursuant to
subsection 2, the vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
9. As used in this section, “large school district” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388G.530.
Sec. 2. NRS 391.455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.455 1. There is hereby created the Teachers and Leaders
Council of Nevada consisting of the following 16 members:
(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her
designee, who serves as an ex officio member of the Council.
(b) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education,
or his or her designee, who serves as an ex officio member of the
Council.
(c) Four teachers in public schools appointed by the Governor
from a list of six nominees consisting of three nominees submitted
by the [Nevada State Education Association.] employee
organization representing the plurality of teachers employed by a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
large school district and three nominees submitted by the
employee organization representing the plurality of teachers
employed by school districts in this State other than a large school
district. The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph must
represent the geographical diversity of the school districts in this
State.
(d) One school counselor, psychologist, speech-language
pathologist, audiologist or social worker who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 391 of NRS appointed by the Governor from a list of six
nominees consisting of three nominees submitted by the [Nevada
State Education Association.] employee organization representing
the plurality of school counselors, psychologists, speech-language
pathologists, audiologists and social workers who are not
administrators and who are employed by a large school district
and three nominees submitted by the employee organization
representing the plurality of school counselors, psychologists,
speech-language pathologists, audiologists and social workers
who are not administrators and who are employed by school
districts in this State other than a large school district. The persons
nominated pursuant to this paragraph must represent the
geographical diversity of school districts in this State.
(e) Two administrators in public schools appointed by the
Governor from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada
Association of School Administrators and one superintendent of
schools of a school district appointed by the Governor from a list of
nominees submitted by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents. The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph
must represent the geographical diversity of the school districts in
this State.
(f) Two persons who are members of boards of trustees of
school districts and who are appointed by the Governor from a list
of nominees submitted by the Nevada Association of School
Boards.
(g) One representative of the regional training programs for the
professional development of teachers and administrators created by
NRS 391A.120 appointed by the Governor from a list of nominees
submitted by the Nevada Association of School Superintendents.
(h) One parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in public
school appointed by the Governor from a list of nominees submitted
by the Nevada Parent Teacher Association.
(i) Two persons with expertise in the development of public
policy relating to education appointed by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction. The members appointed pursuant to this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
paragraph must not otherwise be eligible for appointment pursuant
to paragraphs (a) to (h), inclusive.
2. After the initial terms, each appointed member of the
Council serves a term of 3 years commencing on July 1 and may be
reappointed to one additional 3-year term following his or her initial
term. If any appointed member of the Council ceases to be qualified
for the position to which he or she was appointed, the position shall
be deemed vacant and the appointing authority shall appoint a
replacement for the remainder of the unexpired term. A vacancy
must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
3. The Council shall, at its first meeting and annually
thereafter, elect a Chair from among its members.
4. The Council shall meet at least semiannually and may meet
at other times upon the call of the Chair or a majority of the
members of the Council. Nine members of the Council constitute a
quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the power and authority
conferred on the Council.
5. Members of the Council serve without compensation, except
that for each day or portion of a day during which a member of the
Council attends a meeting of the Council or is otherwise engaged in
the business of the Council, the member is entitled to receive the per
diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
6. A member of the Council who is a public employee must be
granted administrative leave from the member’s duties to engage in
the business of the Council without loss of his or her regular
compensation. Such leave does not reduce the amount of the
member’s other accrued leave.
7. Any costs associated with employing a substitute teacher
while a member of the Council who is a teacher attends a meeting of
the Council must be:
(a) Paid by the school district or charter school that employs the
member; or
(b) Reimbursed to the school district or charter school that
employs the member by the organization that submitted the name of
the member to the Governor for appointment pursuant to paragraph
(c), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) of subsection 1.
8. The Department shall provide administrative support to the
Council.
9. The Council may apply for and accept gifts, grants,
donations and contributions from any source for the purpose of
carrying out its duties pursuant to NRS 391.460.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
10. As used in this section, “large school district” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388G.530.
Sec. 3. NRS 391A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.130 1. The Statewide Council for the Coordination of
the Regional Training Programs, consisting of nine members, is
hereby created. The membership of the Council consists of:
(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee.
(b) One member, who is not a Legislator, appointed by the
Majority Leader of the Senate.
(c) One member, who is not a Legislator, appointed by the
Speaker of the Assembly.
(d) One member who is a teacher at a public school appointed
by the Governor from a list of six nominees consisting of three
nominees submitted by the [Nevada State Education Association.]
employee organization representing the plurality of teachers
employed by a large school district and three nominees submitted
by the employee organization representing the plurality of teachers
employed by school districts in this State other than a large school
district.
(e) One member who is an administrator at a public school
employed to provide administrative services at the school level and
not to provide administrative services at the district level, appointed
by the Governor from a list of nominees submitted by the Nevada
Association of School Administrators.
(f) One member appointed by the Governor.
(g) Three members, each of whom is a superintendent of
schools, or his or her designee, appointed by the governing body of
each regional training program to represent the school districts
served by the regional training program.
2. In making the appointments pursuant to paragraphs (b) to
(g), inclusive, of subsection 1, the appointing authorities shall
consider whether the appointments provide a geographical balance
between urban and rural areas of this State and represent the cultural
diversity of this State.
3. The Statewide Council shall elect a Chair from among its
members.
4. After the initial terms, the appointed members of the
Statewide Council serve a term of 2 years, commencing on July 1 of
the year of appointment. A member may not be appointed to serve
more than 3 consecutive terms.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
5. A vacancy on the Statewide Council must be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original
appointment.
6. Members of the Statewide Council serve without salary for
their service on the Council. The members who are appointed by the
Majority Leader of the Senate and the Speaker of the Assembly are
entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally for each day or
portion of a day during which a member attends a meeting of the
Statewide Council or is otherwise engaged in the work of the
Statewide Council. The per diem allowance and travel expenses for
the members who are appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate and the Speaker of the Assembly must be paid from the
Legislative Fund. To the extent that money is appropriated for this
purpose, all other members of the Statewide Council are entitled to
receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally for each day or portion of a
day during which a member attends a meeting of the Statewide
Council or is otherwise engaged in the work of the Statewide
Council. The per diem allowance and travel expenses for such
members must be paid by the Department.
7. Any costs associated with employing a substitute teacher
while a member of the Statewide Council who is a teacher attends a
meeting of the Statewide Council must be:
(a) Paid by the school district or charter school that employs the
member; or
(b) Reimbursed to the school district or charter school that
employs the member by the organization that submitted the name of
the member to the Governor for appointment pursuant to paragraph
(d), (e), (f) or (g) of subsection 1.
8. The Department shall provide administrative support to the
Statewide Council.
9. The governing bodies of the regional training programs may
mutually agree to expend a portion of their respective budgets to pay
for any administrative support of the Statewide Council that is
required in addition to that provided pursuant to subsection 8.
10. As used in this section, “large school district” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388G.530.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)